North Dakota statutes. TITLE 37 Military
CHAPTER 37-07.2 National Guard Tuition Grants

37-07.2-01.
National guard member grants and tuition waivers — Terms.

Subject to legislative appropriation and rules adopted by the adjutant general, a qualifying member of the national guard who enrolls in an accredited postsecondary institution in North Dakota which is not controlled by the state may receive a grant in an amount not to exceed the cost of tuition and fees for similar courses and credit hours for a qualifying member of the national guard who is enrolled in the North Dakota university system institution with the highest tuition and fee rate.

Any accredited postsecondary institution that is not controlled by the state and which participates in the national guard member grant program shall waive twenty-five percent of the tuition that otherwise would be charged to each enrolled, qualifying member of the national guard.

The adjutant general shall adopt rules for distributing grants under this section and establishing qualification requirements for grant recipients.

A member of the national guard may receive a grant under this section only as long as the member maintains satisfactory performance with the national guard, meets the qualification requirements of the rules adopted under this section, and pursues a course of study satisfying the normal requirements of the postsecondary institution in which the member is enrolled.

For purposes of calculating the grant amount under subsection 1, the “cost of tuition and fees for similar courses and credit hours for a qualifying member of the national guard who is enrolled in the North Dakota university system institution with the highest tuition and fee rate” may not be reduced by more than twenty-five percent pursuant to section 37-07.1-03.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 391, § 1; 1987, ch. 419, § 4; 1995, ch. 351, § 3; 2007, ch. 304, § 2; 2009, ch. 301, § 2; 2015, ch. 248, § 3, effective March 12, 2015; 2019, ch. 41, § 8, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 248, S.L. 2015 became effective March 12, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 6 of chapter 248, S.L. 2015.

Cross-References.

National Guard Tuition Waiver Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 37-07.1.

37-07.2-02.
Limitation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 389, § 2.

37-07.2-03.
Application for grant.

It is the responsibility of the member of the national guard to request the grant on an application provided by the adjutant general. The application must be completed at the time of enrollment for each semester or academic term for which a grant is requested, or upon initial appointment into the national guard. The grants provided for in this chapter must be paid from such funds as may be appropriated for tuition payment purposes in accordance with chapter 37-07.1.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 391, § 3; 2019, ch. 288, § 2, effective March 29, 2019.

37-07.2-04.
Regulations.

The adjutant general may adopt, amend, and rescind any national guard regulations, pursuant to chapter 28-32, deemed necessary to implement and administer this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 391, § 4.